Hawaii statutes.
§121-15 Commissioned and warrant officers;
transfer to inactive list, retirement, separation. Officers may be
transferred to the inactive or retired lists, or separated from the service as
follows:

(1) An officer may be honorably discharged by reason
of resignation, removal of residence from the State, failure to meet or
maintain the requirements for federal recognition, or acceptance of an
incompatible office.

(2) An officer who is eligible to be placed on the
retired list under federal law, or who has completed the years of service
required for retirement under title 10, United States Code, chapter 1223 may at
the officer's request be discharged, or with the approval of the governor be
placed on the retired list.

(3) Any commissioned officer who has served in the
same grade in the military service of the State for a continuous period of not
less than ten years, upon the commissioned officer's own request, may be
honorably discharged or placed on the retired list.

(4) Any officer who is rendered surplus by the
disbandment of the officer's unit, or who changes the officer's residence
within the State and is unable to serve with the unit to which the officer was
assigned, shall be absorbed in another unit of the army or air national guard,
or if there be no such other available unit the officer shall be transferred to
an inactive status as authorized by the secretary of the army or of the air
force, and may be ordered to perform appropriate duties.

(5) At any time the moral character, capacity, and
general fitness for the service of any officer may be investigated and
determined by an efficiency board of three commissioned or warrant officers,
senior in rank to the officer if possible, to be appointed by the governor.
The investigation shall be thorough and impartial, and may include misconduct
in civil life for which the officer is not amenable to trial by court-martial.
If the findings are unfavorable to the officer and are approved by the
governor, the officer shall be discharged.

(6) At any time the physical fitness for the service
of any officer, upon order of the governor, may be investigated and determined
by a board of not less than three commissioned officers, not less than two of
whom shall be medical officers. If the board reports the officer to be
physically unable to perform the duties of the officer's office, and the report
is approved by the governor, the officer may be discharged or placed on the
retired list.

(7) Any officer who is under sentence of imprisonment
by a civil court for any offense involving moral turpitude, whether suspended
or not, or who has been absent without leave for three months, or who refuses
or neglects to report before the board provided in paragraph (5) or (6) within
a period of three months from the time the officer is ordered to report before
the board may be discharged with the approval of the governor.

(8) Upon the approval by the governor of a sentence
of dismissal rendered by a court-martial, the officer shall be dismissed. [L
1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS §121-15; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 339, §1; am L
2012, c 34, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next